California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) The Conservation and Enforcement Services Account is hereby established as an account in the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund created by Section 38225 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) Funds in the Conservation and Enforcement Services Account shall be allocated to the Division of Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Recreation of the Department of Parks and Recreation for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the following purposes:

(1) Up to 40 percent of the funds, for cooperative agreements or challenge cost-sharing agreements with the United States Forest Service and the United States Bureau of Land Management, to complete necessary route designation planning work and to implement route planning decisions.

(2) Up to one million one hundred thousand dollars ($1,100,000) for each grant cycle, to increase the amount of funds available for restoration grants in the program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5090.50 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 199.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

8352.9.

The Controller shall withhold from any funds transferred pursuant to any section of this chapter an amount equal to the cost, as determined by the Department of Transportation, to the State Highway Account for preparing any report needed in order to establish the appropriate amount of any such transfer. He shall transfer such amounts withheld to the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1134.)
-------------------------------------------

8353.

By the 28th day of each calendar month, the balance remaining to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account at the close of business on the 23rd day of the same month, after payments of refunds and administration and enforcement, as provided for in Section 8352.1, shall, on order of the Controller, be transferred to the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 78.   Effective July 1, 1983.   Operative August 1, 1983, by Sec. 149.43 of Ch. 323.)
-------------------------------------------

8359.

The board may, without at the time furnishing vouchers and itemized statements, draw from the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account a sum not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). The sum so drawn shall be used as a revolving fund where cash advances are necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 162.)
-------------------------------------------

8360.

The board may pay out of the appropriations made to it from the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account all expenses incurred in the prosecution before any court of this state of any person charged with the violation of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 163.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Violations [8401. - 8407.]

8401.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, association, or corporation, or any officer or agent thereof, through false statement, trick or device, or otherwise, to do any of the following:

(a) Obtain motor vehicle fuel for export and fail to export it, or cause it not to be exported.

(b) Divert motor vehicle fuel, or cause it to be diverted, from interstate or foreign transit begun in this state.

(c) Return motor vehicle fuel to this state and sell or use it, or cause it to be used or sold in this state, without complying with the provisions of this part and without notifying the supplier from whom the motor vehicle fuel was originally purchased of his or her act.

It is unlawful for any supplier or other person to conspire with any person, firm, association, or corporation, or any officer or agent thereof, to withhold motor vehicle fuel from export, or to divert it from interstate or foreign transit begun in this state, or to return it to this state for sale or use so as to avoid any of the taxes imposed by this part.

Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 8402.

Each shipment illegally diverted or illegally returned constitutes a separate
 offense, and the unit of each shipment is the cargo of one vessel, or one railroad carload, or one automobile truck load, or such truck and trailer load, or one drum, or one barrel, or one case, or one can.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8402.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, association, or corporation, or any officer or agent thereof, to do any of the following:

(a) Fail to pay the tax.

(b) Fail, neglect, or refuse to make and file any statement required by this part in the manner or within the time required.

(c) Make any false statement or conceal any material fact in any
 record, report, affidavit, or claim provided for in this part.

(d) Violate any other provision of this part.

Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, unless the act is by any other law of this state declared to be a felony, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by both fine and imprisonment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8403.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, association, or corporation, or any officer or agent thereof, to conduct any activities requiring a license under this part without a license or after a license has been surrendered, canceled, or revoked. Any violation of this section is subject to the same punishment as is prescribed in Section 8402.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8404.

(a) Any person required to make, render, sign, or verify any return or report who makes any false or fraudulent return or report with intent to defeat or evade the determination of an amount due required by law to be made is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 8402.

(b) Any person who willfully aids or assists in, or procures, counsels, or advises in the preparation or presentation under, or in connection with any matter arising
 under this part, of a return, report, affidavit, claim, or other document which is fraudulent or is false as to any material matter, whether or not the falsity or fraud is with knowledge or consent of the person authorized or required to present the return, report, affidavit, claim, or document is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 8402.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8405.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, any person who willfully evades or attempts in any manner to evade or defeat the payment of the tax imposed by this part is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), imprisonment, or both the fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court. In addition to the fine or imprisonment, or both, each person convicted under this section shall pay up to two
 dollars ($2) for each gallon of motor vehicle fuel, or portion thereof, knowingly removed, entered, blended, or possessed, kept, stored, or retained for the purpose of removal or removed, or offered for removal, or entry, or entered, or for sale, or actually sold, or offered for sale, in violation of this section, as determined by the court.

(b) Proceeds of the assessed penalty shall be distributed to the treasurer of the county in which the action was brought for allocation to the prosecuting agency in the amount necessary to reimburse the agency for its costs of prosecution, and to the county for its reasonable costs of administration of this paragraph. Any remaining proceeds shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the Transportation Tax Fund, and shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to pay administrative costs of the board to enforce this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8406.

Any prosecution for violation of any of the penal provisions of this part shall be instituted within three years after the commission of the offense, or within two years after the violation is discovered, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8407.

(a) (1) Restitution orders or any other amounts imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction for criminal offenses upon a person or any other entity that are due to the State of California and payable to the Controller may be collected by the Controller in any manner provided by law for collection of a delinquent motor vehicle fuel tax liability, including, but not limited to, issuance of an order and levy under Article 4 (commencing with
 Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the manner provided for earnings withholding orders for taxes.

(2) Amounts imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction as an order of restitution for criminal offenses shall be treated as final and due and payable to the State of California on the date that amount is established on the records of the board.

(b) This part shall apply to amounts collected under this section in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if the language of those laws had been incorporated in full into this section, except to the extent that any provision is either inconsistent with this section or is not relevant to this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8101), no refund or
 credit may be allowed for any amounts paid or payments applied under this section.

(d) Amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section may accrue interest at the greater of the rate applicable to the amounts being collected or the rate provided under Section 6591.5 from and after the date the amounts are established on the records of the board.

(e) Amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section are not subject to any statute of limitations set forth in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 7851).

(f) Notwithstanding Section 7872 or Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, any portion of the amounts authorized to be collected under this section that remain unsatisfied may be collected by the recording of a notice of state tax lien. The Controller
 may record or extend a recorded notice of state tax lien at any time until the amount due, including any accrued interest, is paid in full.

(g) This section shall apply on and after January 1, 2012, to amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section that are due to the State of California and payable to the Controller before, on, or after January 1, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 727, Sec. 14.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Metropolitan Transportation Commission [8500. - 8526.]

8500.

Except when the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8501.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions have the following meanings:

(a) “Commission” means the Metropolitan Transportation Commission created by Title 7.1 (commencing with Section 66500) of the Government Code.

(b) “Region” means the region comprising the commission’s jurisdiction, prescribed by Section 66502 of the Government Code.

(c) “Bonds” means
 indebtedness and securities of any kind or class, including bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, and commercial paper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8502.

The commission may impose, in addition to any other tax authorized by this division, a tax on the privilege of selling within the region, motor vehicle fuel, as defined by Section 7326. The tax shall not apply to motor vehicle fuel used to power aircraft. The tax shall be levied at a rate established by the commission, but not exceeding ten cents ($0.10) per gallon. Commencing on January 1 of the year following the election approving the tax, the tax may be imposed for a period not to exceed 20 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8503.

(a) Prior to imposing the tax, the commission shall adopt a regional transportation expenditure plan for the revenues derived from the tax. The regional transportation expenditure plan shall describe specific proposed transportation projects and the estimated cost of each project.

(b) The regional transportation expenditure plan shall also meet the following minimum objectives and criteria:

(1) Project
 expenditures shall reflect an equitable distribution of revenues throughout the region with not less than 95 percent of revenues from each county, based on population, being invested over the 20-year life of the tax in projects attributable to that county. In addition, during every five-year period, no less than 80 percent of the revenues from each county, based on population, invested during that period shall be invested in projects attributable to that county. The commission shall allocate any accrued interest according to the same formula. At the time of the development of the expenditure plan, the commission shall use population data from the most recent United States census, and shall take into account estimated increases in population over the 20-year period projected by the Association of Bay Area Governments.

(2) Projects included in the expenditure plan shall be consistent with the commission’s regional transportation plan, a
 congestion management program, or a countywide transportation plan. The commission shall, in prioritizing projects in the expenditure plan, give additional consideration to projects where local land use policies reduce dependence on single-occupant motor vehicle travel. The expenditure plan development process shall include consultation with cities, counties, transit operators, congestion management agencies, and other interested groups.

(3) Cost estimates for each project shall be prepared by the commission, in consultation with project sponsors, and verified by an independent cost-estimating firm retained by the commission for that purpose. Estimates of other funding required to complete any project shall be based on an estimate of funds reasonably expected to be available during the 20-year period commencing with the year that the tax is initially imposed.

(4) To be eligible
 for inclusion in the expenditure plan, a project shall meet at least one of the following regional transportation needs:

(A) Fund maintenance and rehabilitation of local streets and roads, sidewalks, or bicycle routes, or close a gap in the local street and road system.

(B) Fund capital or operating expenses of public transit systems.

(C) Fund transit expansion projects in the commission’s Resolution 3434, Regional Transit Expansion Program as contained in the commission’s regional transportation plan.

(D) Provide an alternative to single occupancy automobile travel.

(E) Improve safety on specific roadway segments where accident or fatality rates exceed the expected rate for those segments
 over a multiyear timeframe, including, but not limited to, expansion or realignment of the roadway.

(F) Improve the operational efficiency of the existing roadway system without a physical expansion of the system. However, expansion projects to reconfigure existing interchanges are eligible for inclusion in the plan.

(G) Fund implementation of the requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-336), or those requirements as revised, on public transit systems and other transportation-related facilities.

(H) Fund seismic retrofitting of transportation facilities.

(I) Fund intermodal freight or passenger facilities.

(J) Fund transportation enhancement
 activities, including projects consistent with the commission’s Transportation for Livable Communities (TLC) Program and the Housing Incentive Program (HIP).

(K) Defray interest costs and other expenses associated with the issuance of revenue bonds or revenue anticipation notes.

(5) If not otherwise available, sufficient funding shall be included in the cost estimates and expenditure plan presented to the voters to operate and maintain each included project for the duration of the tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 161, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8504.

(a) Following the adoption by the commission of a regional transportation expenditure plan, the board of supervisors of each county and city and county in the region shall, upon the request of the commission, submit to the voters at a local election consolidated with a statewide primary or general election specified by the commission, a measure, adopted by the commission, authorizing the commission to impose the tax throughout the region. 

(b) The measure may not be grouped
 with state or local measures on the ballot, but shall be set forth in a separate category and shall be identified as Regional Measure 2.

(c) Regardless of the system of voting used, the wording of the measure shall read as follows:

“Shall The Metropolitan Transportation Commission be authorized to impose a tax of ____ per gallon on the sale of gasoline to build and operate transportation projects identified in the expenditure plan adopted by the commission?”

(d) The commission shall reimburse each county and city and county in the region for the cost of submitting the measure to the voters. These costs shall be reimbursed from revenues derived from the tax if the measure is approved by the voters or, if the measure is not approved, from any funds of the commission that are available for general transportation planning.

(e) The board of supervisors of a county or city and county may elect not to submit the measure adopted by the commission to the voters if it submits an alternative countywide transportation funding measure to the voters at the same election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.

Upon approval of the measure by the margin of voters within the region voting at a local election as determined necessary by the California Constitution or other applicable statutory provisions, the commission may impose the tax in all counties in the region in which the measure appeared on the ballot.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8506.

The commission shall contract with the State Board of Equalization for the administration of any tax imposed under this chapter, and the board shall be reimbursed for its actual cost in the administration of the tax and for its actual cost of preparation to administer the tax based upon an independent audit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8507.

The State Board of Equalization shall adopt the necessary rules and regulations to administer the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8508.

After deducting its cost of administering the tax, the State Board of Equalization shall periodically transmit the net revenues to the commission as promptly as possible. Transmittal of those revenues shall be made at least twice in each calendar quarter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8509.

The net revenues received by the commission shall be expended only in accordance with the regional transportation expenditure plan adopted pursuant to Section 8503, except that the commission may deduct from those revenues funds to reimburse it for expenses incurred in the initial implementation of this chapter, and thereafter, its cost of administration, not to exceed 1 percent of annual net revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8510.

In order to be eligible for funds derived from the tax, project sponsors shall comply with all applicable commission rules and regulations including, but not limited to, those adopted pursuant to Section 66516 of the Government Code and Sections 99244 and 99246 of the Public Utilities Code. In consultation with cities, counties, transit operators, congestion management agencies, and other interested groups, the commission shall also develop and implement a program to ensure that project sponsors expend funds derived from the tax in an efficient and effective
 manner. No operating or maintenance funding provided from the tax shall be used to supplant any funds within the discretionary control of the recipient agency that are used for existing transportation operating or maintenance activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8511.

The commission’s regional transportation expenditure plan shall include a process of ensuring periodic public review of the progress of the regional transportation expenditure plan and citizen oversight.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8512.

The commission may, by a two-thirds vote, amend the regional transportation expenditure plan after a minimum of two public hearings in accordance with Section 8511. Any amendment shall comply with all of the requirements for the plan prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8513.

(a) If requested to do so by the commission in its resolution calling for an election, the board of supervisors, as part of the ballot proposition to approve the imposition of the tax, shall include authorization for the commission to issue bonds for capital outlay expenditures as may be provided for in the ordinance expenditure plan payable from the proceeds of the tax.

(b) The maximum bonded indebtedness that may be outstanding at any one time shall be an amount equal to the
 sum of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds, but not to exceed the estimated proceeds of the tax, as determined by the plan. The amount of bonds outstanding at any one time does not include the amount of bonds, refunding bonds, or bond anticipation notes for which funds necessary for the payment thereof have been set aside for that purpose in a trust or escrow account.

(c) The proposition shall set forth each of the following:

(1) The actual percent of the tax.

(2) The duration of the tax if the plan specifies a time limit.

(3) The amount of bonds, if any, payable from the proceeds of the tax.

(4) The commission as the agency imposing the tax.

(5) The appropriations limit of the commission, pursuant to Section 4 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution.

(d) The sample ballot to be mailed to the voters, pursuant to Section 13303 of the Elections Code, shall be the full proposition, as set forth in the ordinance calling the election, and the voter information handbook shall include the entire ordinance expenditure plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8514.

(a) The bonds authorized by the voters concurrently with the approval of the tax may be issued at any time by the commission and shall be payable from the proceeds of the tax. The bonds shall be referred to as “limited tax bonds.”

The bonds may be secured by a pledge of revenues from the proceeds of the tax.

(b) The pledge of the tax to the limited tax bonds authorized under this chapter shall have priority over the use of any of the
 tax for “pay-as-you-go” financing, except to the extent that this priority is expressly restricted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8515.

Limited tax bonds shall be issued pursuant to a resolution adopted at any time by a two-thirds vote of the commission. Each resolution shall provide for the issuance of bonds in the amounts as may be necessary, until the full amount of bonds authorized have been issued. The full amount of bonds may be divided into two or more series and different dates of payment fixed for the bonds of each series. A bond need not mature on its anniversary date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8516.

(a) A resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds shall state all of the following:

(1) The purposes for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include all costs and estimated costs incidental to, or connected with, the accomplishment of those purposes, including, without limitation, engineering, inspection, legal, fiscal agent, financial consultant and other fees, bond and other reserve funds, working capital, bond interest estimated to accrue during the
 construction period and for a period not to exceed three years thereafter, and expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(2) The estimated cost of accomplishing those purposes.

(3) The amount of the principal of the indebtedness.

(4) The maximum term the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before maturity, which shall not be beyond the date of termination of the imposition of the tax.

(5) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed the maximum allowable by law.

(6) The denomination or denominations of the bonds, which shall not be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(7) The form of the bonds, including, without limitation, registered bonds and coupon bonds, to the extent permitted by federal law, and the form of any coupons to be attached thereto, the registration, conversion, and exchange privileges, if any, pertaining thereto, and the time when all of, or any part of, the principal becomes due and payable.

(b) The resolution may also contain any other matters authorized by this chapter or any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8517.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding the maximum allowable by law, payable at intervals determined by the commission, except that the first interest payable on the bonds, or any series thereof, may be for any period not exceeding one year, as determined by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8518.

In the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, the commission may also provide for the call and redemption of the bonds prior to maturity at the times and prices and upon other terms as specified. However, no bond is subject to call or redemption prior to maturity, unless it contains a recital to that effect or unless a statement to that effect is printed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8519.

The principal of, and interest on, the bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the treasurer of the commission, or at other places as may be designated, or at both the office and other places at the option of the holders of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8520.

The bonds, or each series thereof, shall be dated and numbered consecutively and shall be signed by the chairperson or vice chairperson of the commission and the auditor-controller of the commission, and the official seal, if any, of the commission shall be attached.

The interest coupons of the bonds shall be signed by the auditor-controller of the commission. All of the signatures and seal may be printed, lithographed, or mechanically reproduced.

If any officer whose signature
 appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be that officer before the delivery of the bonds, the officer’s signature is as effective as if the officer had remained in office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8521.

The bonds may be sold as the commission determines by resolution, and the bonds may be sold at a price below par, whether by negotiated or public sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8522.

Delivery of any bonds may be made at any place either inside or outside the state, and the purchase price may be received in cash or bank credits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8523.

All accrued interest and premiums received on the sale of the bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds, and the remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the treasury of the commission and applied to secure the bonds or for the purposes for which the debt was incurred. However, when the purposes have been accomplished, any money remaining shall be either (a) transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of, and interest on, the bonds or (b) placed in a fund to be
 used for the purchase of the outstanding bonds in the open market at prices and in the manner, either at public or private sale or otherwise, as determined by the commission. Bonds so purchased shall be canceled immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8524.

(a) The commission may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds to redeem or retire any bonds issued by the commission upon the terms, at the times, and in the manner which it determines.

(b) Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to pay all, or any part of, the principal of the outstanding bonds, the premiums, if any, due upon call and redemption thereof prior to maturity, all expenses of the refunding, and either of the
 following:

(1) The interest upon the refunding bonds from the date of sale thereof to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded out of the proceeds of the sale of the refunding bonds or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holders of the bonds.

(2) The interest upon the bonds to be refunded from the date of sale of the refunding bonds to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holder of the bonds.

(c) The provisions of this chapter for the issuance and sale of bonds apply to the issuance and sale of refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8525.

(a) The commission may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds which have been authorized pursuant to this chapter, but which have not been sold or delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor and may renew the bond anticipation notes from time to time. However, the maximum maturity of any bond anticipation notes, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed five years from the date of delivery of the original bond anticipation notes.

(b) The bond anticipation notes, and the interest thereon, may be paid from any money of the commission available therefor, including the revenues from the tax. If not previously otherwise paid, the bond anticipation notes, or any portion thereof, or the interest thereon, shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the bonds of the commission in anticipation of which the notes were issued.

(c) The bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of the bonds which the commission has been authorized to issue, less the amount of any bonds of the authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefor issued and then outstanding. The bond anticipation notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds.

(d) The bond anticipation notes and the resolutions authorizing
 them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a resolution of the commission may contain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8526.

Any bonds issued under this chapter are legal investment for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, commercial and savings banks, and trust companies; and for state school funds; and whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within the state, that money or those funds may be invested in the bonds issued under this chapter, and whenever bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within the state may, by any law now or
 hereafter enacted, be used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public money, the bonds issued under this chapter may be so used. The provisions of this chapter are in addition to all other laws relating to legal investments and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. USE FUEL TAX [8601. - 9355.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [8601. - 8621.]

8601.

This part is known and may be cited as the “Use Fuel Tax Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

8602.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

8603.

As used in this part “motor vehicle” includes every self-propelled vehicle operated or suitable for operation on the highway, except a vehicle used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1217.)
-------------------------------------------

8604.

“Fuel” includes any combustible gas or liquid, by whatever name the gas or liquid may be known or sold, of a kind used in an internal combustion engine for the generation of power to propel a motor vehicle on the highways, except fuel that is subject to the tax imposed by Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301) or Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001).

It does not include any combustible gas or liquid specifically manufactured and used for racing motor vehicles at a racetrack.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

8605.

“Highway” includes a way or place, of whatever nature, publicly maintained and open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel.

A private road is not a highway for the purposes of this part unless it has been dedicated and accepted by the proper public authorities as a public highway. The mere use of a private road by one or more members of the public, with or without the consent of the owner, does not make it a highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1051.)
-------------------------------------------

8606.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, association, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, syndicate, this state, any county, city and county, municipality, district, or other political subdivision thereof, or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 49.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8607.

“Use” includes the placing of fuel into any receptacle on a motor vehicle from which fuel is supplied for the propulsion of the vehicle unless the operator of the vehicle establishes to the satisfaction of the board that the fuel was consumed for a purpose other than the operation of a motor vehicle within this State and, with respect to fuel brought into this State in any such receptacle, the consumption of the fuel in this State. A person placing fuel in a receptacle on a motor vehicle of another who holds a valid use fuel tax permit is not deemed to have used the fuel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1814.)
-------------------------------------------

8608.

(a) “User” includes any person who, within the meaning of the term “use” as defined in this chapter, uses fuel.

(b) Article 1 (commencing with Section 8701) of Chapter 3 and Article 1 (commencing with Section 8751) of Chapter 4 do not apply to (1) a user whose sole use of fuel in this state is for the propulsion of a privately operated passenger motor vehicle, a commercial vehicle with unladen weight of less than 7,000 pounds, or a privately operated two-axle truck which the
 user has rented or leased for a period of 30 days or less; or (2) an interstate user whose sole use of fuel in this state is for the propulsion of a motor vehicle that is not a qualified motor vehicle and is operated in connection with an interstate trip; if the fuel used, except fuel brought into this state in the fuel tank of the vehicle, is purchased from and delivered into the fuel tank of the vehicle by a vendor.

(c) When the board determines that it is necessary for the efficient administration of this part to regard any lessor of vehicles as the agent of the lessee, with regard to the equipment leased, the board may so regard the lessor and may qualify the lessee as the user for purposes of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

8609.
